Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5231.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Gorham Street (ST3A) overpass identified by MassDOT as bridge number C-08-039
spanning Interstate 495 in the town of Chelmsford shall be designated as the “Ferreira Brothers
Bridge” in recognition of John C. Ferreira, Manuel C. Ferreira, and Anthony C. Ferreira for their
service and contributions to the US armed forces and the town of Chelmsford. The highway
division of MassDOT shall erect and maintain suitable makers bearing that designation in
compliance with the standards of the division.
of 1